Wisconsin, session 2025, AB684.
do enact as follows:AB684,11Section 1. 59.90 of the statutes is repealed.AB684,22Section 2. 62.50 (1h) of the statutes is amended to read:AB684,4,2362.50 (1h) Organization. In all 1st class cities, however incorporated, there 4shall be a board of fire and police commissioners, consisting of either 7 or 9 citizens, 5not more than 3, if the board has 7 members, or 4, if the board has 9 members, of 6whom shall at any time belong to the same political party. At least one member of 7the board shall be selected from a list submitted under sub. (1j) by the employee 8association that represents nonsupervisory law enforcement officers and at least 9one member shall be selected from a list submitted under sub. (1j) by the employee 10association that represents fire fighters. For an appointment that is required to be 11selected from a list under this subsection, the mayor shall make the appointment 12within 45 days after receiving a list under sub. (1j). The staff and members of the 13board shall receive the salary or other compensation for their services fixed by the 14common council. The salary shall be fixed at the same time and in the same 15manner as the salary of other city officials and employees. Except as otherwise 16provided in this subsection, a majority of the members-elect, as that term is used in 17s. 59.001 (2m), of the board shall constitute a quorum necessary for the transaction 18of business. A 3-member panel of the board may conduct, and decide by majority 19vote, a trial described under sub. (12) or may hear and decide, by majority vote, 1charges filed by an aggrieved person under sub. (19). It shall be the duty of the 2mayor of the city, on or before the 2nd Monday in July, to appoint 7, or 9, members 3of the board, designating the term of office of each, one to hold one year, 2 to hold 2 4years, 2 to hold 3 years, one to hold 4 years if the board has 7 members, and 2 to 5hold 4 years if the board has 9 members, and one to hold 5 years if the board has 7 6members, and 2 to hold 5 years if the board has 9 members, and until their 7respective successors shall be appointed and qualified. Thereafter the terms of 8office shall be 5 years from the 2nd Monday in July, and until a successor is 9appointed and qualified. The mayor may reduce the size of the board from 9 to 7 10members by failing to appoint 2 successors for individuals whose terms expire at 11the same time. Every person appointed a member of the board shall be subject to 12confirmation by the common council and every appointed member shall, before 13entering upon the duties of the office take and subscribe the oath of office 14prescribed by article IV, section 28, of the constitution, and file the same duly 15certified by the officer administering it, with the clerk of the city. A member of the 16board may not continue in office after the expiration of his or her term unless the 17member is reappointed to the board and confirmed by the common council. Not 18later than the first day of the 7th month beginning after a member appointed by the 19mayor is confirmed by the common council, the member shall enroll in a training 20class that is related to the mission of the board and, not later than the first day of 21the 13th month beginning after a member appointed by the mayor is confirmed by 22the common council, the member shall complete the class. The training class shall 23be conducted by the city. Appointments made prior to the time this subchapter first 1applies to a 1st class city shall not be subject to confirmation by the common 2council.AB684,33Section 3. 62.50 (1j) of the statutes is repealed.AB684,44Section 4. 62.50 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB684,4,10562.50 (1m) Policy review. The board shall conduct at least once each year a 6policy review of all aspects of the operations of the police and fire departments of 7the city and may advise the common council regarding any recommended policy 8changes. The board may prescribe general policies and standards for the 9department and inspect any property of the departments, including but not limited 10to books and records, required for a review under this section.AB684,511Section 5. 62.50 (3) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB684,4,121262.50 (3) (title) Regulation of the departments Rules.AB684,613Section 6. 62.50 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB684,4,191462.50 (3) (a) The chief of each department shall establish policies relating to 15the control and management board may prescribe rules for the government of the 16members of each department and may delegate its rule-making authority to the 17chief of each department. The board shall prescribe a procedure for review, 18modification and suspension of any rule which is prescribed by the chief, including 19any rule which is in effect on March 28, 1984.AB684,720Section 7. 62.50 (3) (am) of the statutes is amended to read:AB684,4,232162.50 (3) (am) The common council may suspend or modify any policy 22established any rule prescribed by the board under par. (a) only upon a two-thirds 23vote of all of the members of the common council.AB684,81Section 8. 62.90 of the statutes is repealed.AB684,92Section 9. 66.1105 (2) (f) 2. e. of the statutes is amended to read:AB684,5,8366.1105 (2) (f) 2. e. For a tax incremental district in the city of Milwaukee, 4direct or indirect expenses related to developing, constructing, or operating a rail 5fixed guideway transportation system, as defined in s. 85.066 (1), in the city of 6Milwaukee. This subd. 2. e. does not apply to the development or construction of a 7rail fixed guideway transportation system route traversing Clybourn Street and 8Michigan Street, referred to as the “Lakefront Line.”AB684,109Section 10. 77.70 (2) (c) of the statutes is repealed.AB684,1110Section 11. 77.701 (2) (c) of the statutes is repealed.AB684,1211Section 12. 77.701 (3) of the statutes is repealed.AB684,1312Section 13. 79.039 (1) of the statutes is repealed.AB684,1413Section 14. 79.039 (1m) of the statutes is repealed.AB684,5,1414